Maryland, session 2025, HB0453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 2 – Anne Arundel County
17–11–215.
(a) By ordinance enacted by the County Council, and subject to any applicable
express prohibition in the Anne Arundel County Charter, the County may fix, impose, and
collect development impact fees for financing, in whole or in part, the capital costs of
additional or expanded public works, improvements, and facilities required to accommodate
new construction or development.
(b) (1) By ordinance enacted by the County Council, the County may grant
exemptions from or credits against development impact fees [for:
(I) development by not–for–profit entities that have been in
existence for at least 3 years; OR
(II) A CONSTRUCTION OR DEVELOPMENT PROJECT THAT:
1. IS A MODERATELY PRICED DWELLING UNIT, AS
DEFINED IN § 17–12–101;
2. IS AN ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT, AS DEFINED IN §
18–1–101;
– 1 –

Ch. 473 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 18–10–174
FOR WORKFORCE HOUSING; OR
4. A. QUALIFIES FOR IMPACT FEE CREDITS FOR ANY
CONVEYANCE OF LAND OR CONSTRUCTION RECEIVED AND ACCEPTED BY THE
COUNTY OR THE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION FROM A DEVELOPER, INCLUDING
THE CONSTRUCTION OF A CONTRACT SCHOOL BY A DEVELOPER OR A DEVELOPER’S
AGENT UNDER AN AGREEMENT WITH THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION; AND
B. THE CONVEYANCE OR CONSTRUCTION MEETS THE
SAME NEEDS AS THE DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE TO PROVIDE EXPANDED CAPACITY
BEYOND THE REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLE 17].
(2) The ordinance shall:
(i) set the amount of the exemptions or credits;
(ii) establish the conditions of eligibility for the exemptions or
credits; and
(iii) adopt procedures for applying for the exemptions or credits.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –